lt-LT: Stabdžių trinkelės mišinio tipas: Anglies pluoštas; Keramika; Hibridinis; „Kevlar“ mišinys; Organinis / dervų; Pusiau metalinis; Sintetintas metalas; Kita
ro-RO: Materialul plăcuțelor de frână: Carbon; Ceramică; Hibrid; Amestec cu Kevlar; Organic/rășină; Semimetalic; Metal sinterizat; Altele
nb: Bremseklossblanding: Karbon; Keramisk; Hybrid; Kevlar-blanding; Organisk/resin; Semimetallisk; Sintret metall; Annet
ru: Состав тормозной колодки: Карбон; Керамика; Гибрид; Смесь с Kevlar; Органика/смола; Полуметалл; Спеченный металл; Другое
fi: Jarrupalayhdiste: Hiili; Keraaminen; Hybridi; Kevlar-sekoite; Orgaaninen/hartsi; Puolimetallinen; Sintrattu metalli; Muu
sk-SK: Zmes brzdových doštičiek: Karbónová; Keramická; Hybridná; Zmes kevlaru; Organická/živicová; Polometalická; Spekaný kov (Sintrovaná); Iná
tr: Fren balatası bileşimi: Karbon; Seramik; Hibrit; Kevlar karışımı; Organik/reçine; Yarı metalik; Sinterli metal; Diğer
nl: Remblok samenstelling: Carbon; Keramisch; Hybride; Kevlar-mengsel; Organisch/hars; Semimetallisch; Gesinterd metaal; Overig
th: สารประกอบของผ้าเบรก: คาร์บอน; เซรามิก; ไฮบริด; ผสม Kevlar; ออร์แกนิก/เรซิน; กึ่งโลหะ; โลหะซินเทอร์; อื่นๆ
fr: Composition des plaquettes de frein: Carbone; Céramique; Hybride; Mélange Kevlar; Organique/résine; Semi-métallique; Métal fritté; Autre
ja: ブレーキパッドコンパウンド: カーボン; セラミック; ハイブリッド; ケブラーブレンド; オーガニック/レジン; セミメタル; 焼結合金 (シンタード); その他
bg-BG: Състав на спирачните накладки: Карбон; Керамика; Хибрид; Смес с Kevlar; Органика/смола; Полуметал; Синтерован метал; Други
it: mescola delle pastiglie freno: Carbonio; Ceramica; Ibrida; Misto Kevlar; Organica/resina; Semimetallica; Metallo sinterizzato; Altro
zh-CN: 刹车片摩擦配方: 碳; 陶瓷; 混合; Kevlar 混合; 有机物/树脂; 半金属; 烧结金属; 其他
zh-TW: 煞車片複合物: 碳纖維; 陶瓷; 混合; Kevlar 混合材質; 有機/樹脂; 半金屬; 燒結金屬; 其他
el: Μείγμα για τακάκια φρένων: Άνθρακας; Κεραμικό; Υβριδικό; Μείγμα Kevlar; Οργανικό/ρητίνη; Ημιμεταλλικό; Πυροσυσσωματωμένο μέταλλο; Άλλο
sv: Bromsbeläggsblandning: Kolfiber; Keramisk; Hybrid; Kevlar-blandning; Organisk/harts; Semimetallisk; Sintrad metall; Övrigt
sl-SI: Zmes zavornih ploščic: Karbon; Keramika; Hibrid; Mešanica Kevlar; Organski/smola; Polkovinski; Sintrana kovina; Drugo
cs: Směs do brzdových destiček: Karbon; Keramika; Hybridní; Směs Kevlar; Organická / pryskyřice; Polometalická; Slinutý kov; Jiné
hu: Fékbetét anyagösszetétele: Karbon; Kerámia; Hibrid; Kevlar keverék; Organikus/gyantás; Félfémes; Szinterezett fém; Egyéb
en: Brake pad compound: Carbon; Ceramic; Hybrid; Kevlar blend; Organic/resin; Semi-metallic; Sintered metal; Other
vi: Thành phần má phanh: Carbon; Gốm; Lai; Hỗn hợp Kevlar; Hữu cơ/nhựa; Bán kim loại; Kim loại thiêu kết; Khác
de: Bremsbelagmischung: Carbon; Keramik; Hybrid; Kevlar-Mischung; Organisch/Resin; Halbmetallisch; Sintermetall; Sonstige
da: Bremseklodsblanding: Carbon; Keramisk; Hybrid; Kevlar-blanding; Organisk/resin; Semimetallisk; Sintermetal; Andet
pt-PT: Composto da pastilha de travão: Carbono; Cerâmica; Híbrido; Mistura de Kevlar; Orgânico/resina; Semimetálico; Metal sinterizado; Outro
pl: Mieszanka klocka hamulcowego: Włókno węglowe; Ceramiczne; Hybrydowe; Mieszanka Kevlar; Organiczne/żywiczne; Półmetaliczne; Metal spiekany; Inne
es: Compuesto de la pastilla de freno: Carbono; Cerámica; Híbrido; Mezcla de Kevlar; Orgánico/resina; Semimetálico; Metal sinterizado; Otro
hr-HR: Smjesa za kočione pločice: Ugljik; Keramika; Hibrid; Mješavina Kevlara; Organika/smola; Polumetalik; Sinterirani metal; Ostalo
ko: 브레이크 패드 컴파운드: 카본; 세라믹; 하이브리드; Kevlar 블렌드; 유기질/수지; 세미 메탈릭; 소결 금속; 기타
pt-BR: Composto da pastilha de freio: Carbono; Cerâmica; Híbrido; Mistura de Kevlar; Orgânico/resina; Semimetálico; Metal sinterizado; Outro